Utah statutes.
19-6-416.5.   Restrictions on underground storage tank installation companies -- Civil penalty.

(1)  After July 1, 1994, no individual or underground installation company may install an underground storage tank without having a valid underground storage tank installation company permit.

(2)  Any individual or underground storage tank installation company who installs an underground storage tank in violation of Subsection (1) is subject to a civil penalty of $500 per underground storage tank.

(3)  The director shall issue a notice of agency action assessing a civil penalty of $500 against any underground storage tank installation company or person who installs an underground storage tank in violation of Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

